Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202060-6,174
Moving heavy equipment at railroad grade crossings; required to stop.

(1) No person shall operate or move any crawler-type tractor, any steam shovel, any derrick, any roller, or any equipment or structure having a normal operating speed of ten miles per hour or less or a vertical body or load clearance of less than one-half inch per foot of the distance between any two adjacent axles or in any event of less than nine inches, measured above the level surface of a roadway, upon or across any track at a railroad grade crossing without first complying with this section.

(2) Before making any such crossing, the person operating or moving any such vehicle or equipment shall first stop the same not less than fifteen feet nor more than fifty feet from the nearest rail of such railroad and while so stopped shall listen and look in both directions along such track for any approaching railroad train or on-track equipment and for signals indicating the approach of a railroad train or on-track equipment. The person shall not proceed until the crossing can be made safely.

(3) No such crossing shall be made while warning is given by an automatic signal, by crossing gates, by a flagperson, or otherwise of the immediate approach of a railroad train or on-track equipment. If a flagperson is provided by the railroad, movement over the crossing shall be under his or her direction.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 59;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-659;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 270;

Laws 2019, LB81, § 7.